Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 3 Limitation of Actions
§ 1-3-111.
Improvements to real property; generally.

Unless the parties to the contract agree otherwise, no action to recover damages, whether in tort, contract, indemnity or otherwise, shall be brought more than ten (10) years after substantial completion of an improvement to real property, against any person constructing, altering or repairing the improvement, manufacturing or furnishing materials incorporated in the improvement, or performing or furnishing services in the design, planning, surveying, supervision, observation or management of construction, or administration of construction contracts for:

Any deficiency in the design, planning, supervision, construction, surveying, manufacturing or supplying of materials or observation or management of construction;

Injury to any property arising out of any deficiency listed in paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

Injury to the person or wrongful death arising out of any deficiency listed in paragraph (i) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, if an injury to property or person or an injury causing wrongful death occurs during the ninth year after substantial completion of the improvement to real property, an action to recover damages for the injury or wrongful death may be brought within one (1) year after the date on which the injury occurs.

This section shall not be construed to extend the period for bringing an action allowed by the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-21.2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1981, ch. 166, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to saving clause for persons under disabilities, see §

1-3-114

.

Purpose of section. —

Section 2, ch. 166, Laws 1981, states that the purpose of that act is to allocate the burden of insuring improvements to the possessor after 10 years as it is not in the public interest to impose liability in perpetuity on those providing goods or services necessary for the improvement.

Former subsection (a) violated constitution. —

Subsection (a), as it read prior to the 1981 amendment, violated article 1, §§ 8 and 34 and article 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.Phillips v. ABC Builders, 611 P.2d 821,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1980).

Section is constitutional

and does not violate the open courts, uniform operation of general law, and special and local laws provisions of the Wyoming constitution. Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).

Section was intended to apply without regard for discovery

in application of its 10-year period. Richardson Associates v. Lincoln-Devore, 806 P.2d 790,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1991).

“Improvement to real property.” —

Given the insufficient factual record regarding the use and permanency of the product at issue, a question of fact existed as to whether the product constituted an “improvement to real property” which would afford the defendant the protection of the statute of repose. Covington v. W.R. Grace-Conn, Inc., 952 P.2d 1105,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1998).

“Substantial completion.”

Homeowners'
suit alleging defects in a condominium's HVAC system was not barred
by the statute of repose because (1) the statute began to run when
the condominium and system were substantially completed, as defined
in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-110

, which occurred when the condominium and system could
be used for their intended purposes, and (2) the condominium and
system
could not be used for their intended purposes until a certificate
of occupancy was issued less than ten years before the homeowners
filed suit. Horning v. Penrose Plumbing & Heating, Inc., 2014 WY 133, 336 P.3d 151,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2014).

Section inapplicable for failure to maintain, inspect. —

Where the alleged negligent action of the defendants (failure to discover, disclose and warn) occurred after construction was completed and was not a “deficiency in the design, planning, supervision, construction, surveying, manufacturing or supplying of materials or observation or management of construction,” this section was not applicable to the plaintiff's cause of action for negligent failure to maintain and inspect the property and discover and disclose a dangerous condition which was known or should have been known. Goodrich v. Seamands, 870 P.2d 1061,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1994).

Defense not waived by failure to plead. —

An affirmative defense, specifically the statute of repose found in this section, is not deemed waived by the failure to plead it or by admitting an inconsistent factual allegation. Loftus v. Romsa Constr., 913 P.2d 856,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1996).

Construction of public school building by school district is sovereign activity,

and the applicable statutes of limitations cannot be invoked to bar the school district from bringing an action against a contractor or an architect for damages arising out of that construction in order to vindicate public rights. Laramie County Sch. Dist. Number One v. Muir, 808 P.2d 797,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1991).

Statute of repose asserted on remand. —

Because a statute of repose and a statute of limitations can be applied to the same facts to bar the same cause of action, they are not truly inconsistent; therefore, a defendant land surveyor could subsequently assert on remand a new statute of limitations (subsection (a) of this section) labeled as a statute of repose, after stipulating in the prior adjudication that another statute of limitations, § 1-3-107(a)(i) (rendering professional services), controlled the case. Bredthauer v. TSP, 864 P.2d 442,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. Dec. 21, 1993).

Quoted

in

NuHome Invs., LLC v. Weller, 2003 WY 171, 81 P.3d 940,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Mills v. Reynolds, 807 P.2d 383,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1991); Pioneer Water & Sewer Dist. v. Civil Eng'g Professionals, Inc., 905 P.2d 1245,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Statute of Limitations for Architects and Builders as Special Legislation, Phillips v. ABC Builders, 611 P.2d 821,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1980),” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 313 (1981).

For case note, “Builder-Vendors' Broadened Liability for Selecting an Unsafe Homesite. Homeowners-Sellers' Duty to Warn. ABC Builders, Inc. v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What statute of limitations governs action by contractee for defective or improper performance of work by private building contractor, 1 ALR3d 914.

Validity and construction of time limitation upon action against architect or engineer, 93 ALR3d 1242.

Statutes of limitation: actions by purchasers or contractees against vendors or contractors involving defects in houses or other buildings caused by soil instability, 12 ALR4th 866.

Validity and construction of statute terminating right of action for product-caused injury at fixed period after manufacture, sale or delivery of product, 30 ALR5th 1.

Modern status of the application of “discovery rule” to postpone running of limitations against actions relating to breach of building and construction contracts, 33 ALR5th 1.

Surveyor's liability for mistake in, or misrepresentation as to accuracy of, survey of real property, 117 ALR5th 23.

What constitutes “improvement to real property” for purposes of statute of repose or statute of limitations, 122 ALR 5th 1.

§ 1-3-112.
Improvements to real property; exception as to persons in possession
or control.

The limitation prescribed
by this act [§§

1-3-110

through

1-3-113

] shall not be asserted by way of defense by any person
in actual possession or control, as owner, tenant or otherwise, of
the improvement at the time any deficiency in the improvement constitutes
the proximate cause of the injury or death for which it is proposed
to bring an action.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-21.3; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Quoted

in

Worden v. Village Homes, 821 P.2d 1291,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “improvement to real property” for purposes of statute of repose or statute of limitations, 122 ALR 5th 1.

§ 1-3-113.
Improvements to real property; extension of limitations precluded.

Nothing in this act [§§

1-3-110

through

1-3-113

] shall be construed as extending the period prescribed
by law for the bringing of any action.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-21.4; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “improvement to real property” for purposes of statute of repose or statute of limitations, 122 ALR 5th 1.

§ 1-3-114.
Legal disabilities.

If a person entitled
to bring any action except for an action arising from error or omission
in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health care
services or for a penalty or forfeiture, is, at the time the cause
of action accrues, a minor or subject to any other legal disability,
the person may bring the action within three (3) years after the disability
is removed or within any other statutory period of limitation, whichever
is greater.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 39; R.S. 1887, § 2375; R.S. 1889, § 3460; C.S. 1910, § 4304; C.S. 1920, § 5573; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 85; R.S. 1931, § 89-415; C.S. 1945, § 3-510; W.S. 1957, § 1-22; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1976, ch. 18, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Minor tolling provision. —

Statute of
limitations for minors, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a)(ii), violated Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 8. The court also held that the exception now contained
in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-114

“except for an action arising from error or omission
in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health
care
services”
was constitutionally infirm. Kordus v. Montes, 2014 WY 146, 337 P.3d 1138,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2014).

Because the limitation period in § 1-38-102(d) is a condition precedent, and not a statute of limitation, the minor tolling provision of this section is not applicable to the wrongful death statute. Corkill v. Knowles, 955 P.2d 438,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

See “Attorney's Liability in Title Examination,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 177.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proof of unadjudged incompetency which prevents running of statute of limitations, 9 ALR2d 964.

Time of existence of mental incompetency which will prevent or suspend running of statute of limitations, 41 ALR2d 726.

Imprisonment of party to civil action as tolling statute of limitations, 77 ALR3d 735.

Tolling of state statute of limitations in favor of one commencing action despite existing disability, 30 ALR4th 1092.

Tolling of statute of limitations, on account of minority of injured child, as applicable to parent's or guardian's right of action arising out of same injury, 49 ALR4th 216.

Wrongful death: surviving parent's minority as tolling limitation period on suit for child's wrongful death, 54 ALR4th 362.

Local government tort liability: minority as affecting notice of claim requirement, 58 ALR4th 402.

Attorney malpractice — Tolling or other exceptions to running of statute of limitations, 87 ALR5th 473.

Effect of appointment of legal representative for person under mental disability on running of state statute of limitations against such person,111 ALR5th 159.

Effect of appointment of legal representative for minor on running of state statute of limitations against minor, 1 ALR6th 407.

When is person, other than one claiming posttraumatic stress syndrome or memory repression, within coverage of statutory provision tolling running of limitations period on basis of mental disability. 23 A.L.R.6th 697.

§ 1-3-115.
Liability created by federal statute.

All actions upon a liability
created by a federal statute, other than a forfeiture or penalty,
for which no period of limitations is provided in such statute, shall
be commenced within two (2) years after the cause of action has accrued.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 77, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-511; W.S. 1957, § 1-23; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Existing causes of action. —

Section 2, ch. 77, Laws 1943, reads: “This act shall not apply to any existing cause of action which accrued more than one year before this act takes effect, provided suit be instituted thereon within one year after this act takes effect.”

Section 3, ch. 77, Laws 1943, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 23, 1943.

Section hostile against federal causes of action. —

Although the two-year limitations period provided in this section is not necessarily hostile to a federal cause of action by virtue of the amount of time provided, a comparison of the amount of time provided for causes of action arising under state law with the amount of time provided for actions arising under federal law demonstrates the statute's hostility against federal causes of action. Trustees of Wyoming Laborers Health & Welfare Plan v. Morgen & Oswood Constr. Co., 850 F.2d 613, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 8635 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, NLRB v. Viola Industries-Elevator Div., Inc., 979 F.2d 1384, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 28309 (10th Cir. Kan. 1992), overruled in part, NLRB v. Viola Industries-Elevator Div., 979 F.2d 1384, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 28310 (10th Cir. Kan. 1992).

Pursuit of state court remedies does not toll section. —

A plaintiff under 42 USCS § 1983 does not toll the running of this section by pursuing remedies in state courts. Spiegel v. School Dist., 600 F.2d 264, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 14003 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979), overruled in part, Garcia v. Wilson, 731 F.2d 640, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 24023 (10th Cir. N.M. 1984).

Criminal charges do not toll statute of limitations. —

Where civil rights claims brought pursuant to 42 USCS § 1983 arise out of the same incident as criminal charges, the pendency of the criminal charges does not toll the statute of limitations. Lafferty v. Nickel, 663 P.2d 168,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1983), overruled, Ray v. St. Vincent Healthcare, Inc., 2006 WY 98, 139 P.3d 464,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2006).

Section was inapplicable to action brought under the Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act

by trustees of a pension plan to recover delinquent contributions. Trustees of Wyoming Laborers Health & Welfare Plan v. Morgen & Oswood Constr. Co., 850 F.2d 613, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 8635 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, NLRB v. Viola Industries-Elevator Div., Inc., 979 F.2d 1384, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 28309 (10th Cir. Kan. 1992), overruled in part, NLRB v. Viola Industries-Elevator Div., 979 F.2d 1384, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 28310 (10th Cir. Kan. 1992).

Section 1983 claims. —

The statute of limitations for 42 USCS § 1983 actions brought in this state is controlled by the personal injury statute of limitations, §

1-3-105

.Sullivan v. Bailiff, 867 F. Supp. 992, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16706 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Statute of limitations for claims brought in Wyoming state courts under 42 U.S.C.S. § 1983 was four years pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-105(a)(iv)(C), not two years under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-115

; the inmate's motion to amend his counterclaim and cross-claim under this section to add a § 1983 cause of action was brought within four years and should not have been denied as untimely.
Ray v. St. Vincent Healthcare, Inc., 2006 WY 98, 139 P.3d 464,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2006).

Punitive damages claim not “penalty” action. —

A claim for punitive damages does not transform a civil suit brought under 42 USCS § 1983 into a “penalty” action outside the scope of this section. Spiegel v. School Dist., 600 F.2d 264, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 14003 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979), overruled in part, Garcia v. Wilson, 731 F.2d 640, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 24023 (10th Cir. N.M. 1984).

When actions for civil rights violations arise. —

Actions giving rise to alleged civil rights violations arise upon unlawful arrest, confinement and prosecution and not upon the reversal of these convictions. Lafferty v. Nickel, 663 P.2d 168,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1983), overruled, Ray v. St. Vincent Healthcare, Inc., 2006 WY 98, 139 P.3d 464,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2006).

Federal cause of action based on termination of employment necessarily accrues when termination becomes final.

Spiegel v. School Dist., 600 F.2d 264, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 14003 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979), overruled in part, Garcia v. Wilson, 731 F.2d 640, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 24023 (10th Cir. N.M. 1984).

Action involving continuous series of actions occurring within
statutory time period not barred. —

A federal civil rights action brought by a psychologist was not time-barred by this section, as the defendant, also a psychologist, had embarked on a continuous campaign to destroy the plaintiff's professional standing, involving a series of actions, including contacts with others which occurred, in part at least, within the statutory two-year period. Corbitt v. Andersen, 778 F.2d 1471, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 25531 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985), limited, Pindell v. Wilson-Mckee, 60 F. Supp. 2d 1244, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12878 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Period of limitations or laches to be applied under 29 U.S.C. §§ 185, 187 in action for breach of labor contract or damages from unfair labor practice, 19 ALR3d 1034.

State statute of limitations as affecting federal civil rights actions under 42 U.S.C. § 1981, 29 ALR Fed 710.

What limitation periods apply under 28 U.S.C. § 2415 to government suits, 31 ALR Fed 348.

Time for bringing private civil action for discrimination in housing
under §§ 810 and 812 of Fair Housing Act (42 USC §§ 3610
and 3612),
62 ALR Fed 267.

Laches or other assertion of untimeliness as defense to action
under title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.) brought by equal employment opportunity commission,
67 ALR Fed 381.

When does state statute of limitations begin to run in civil action for securities fraud under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)), 71 ALR Fed 257.

Applicable state limitations period in actions under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)) and SEC Rule 10b-5 (17 CFR § 240.10b-5), 72 ALR Fed 763.

Extensions of time under §
108(a) of the Bankruptcy Code (11 USC § 108(a)),
80 ALR Fed 374.

What constitutes “inquiry notice” sufficient to commence running of statute of limitations in securities fraud action — Post-Lampf cases, 148 ALR Fed 629.

§ 1-3-116.
Absence from state, abscondence or concealment.

If a cause of action
accrues against a person when he is out of the state, or has absconded
or concealed himself, the period limited for the commencement of the
action does not begin to run until he comes into the state or while
he is so absconded or concealed. If after the cause of action accrues
he departs from the state or absconds or conceals himself, the time
of his absence or concealment is not computed as a part of the period
within which the action shall be brought.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 42; R.S. 1887, § 2378; R.S. 1899, § 3463; C.S. 1910, § 4307; C.S. 1920, § 5576; R.S. 1931, § 89-418; C.S. 1945, § 3-519; W.S. 1957, § 1-24; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process outside state, see §

5-1-107

.

Construed in pari materia. —

Section

1-39-102

must be read together with this section and §

1-6-301

.Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Defendant must be beyond reach of law for service. —

In order to consider the invocation of this section it must be read to mean and understood to say that the defendant has absconded, concealed himself or departed from the state in such manner so that he is beyond the reaches of the law for purposes of service. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

There can be no reason for a tolling statute except where service is impossible or unusually difficult. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

The need and reason for the tolling statute fails where there is another readily available method of service. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Where there is provision for substituted service section is inapplicable,

and the limitation statute means what it says. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Where a provision authorizes service on the nonresident motorist or the resident motorist who has concealed himself or who has absconded, the tolling statute serves no purpose. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

The absence from the state of a defendant in a wrongful death action did not toll the statute of limitations by reason of the applicability of this section where the defendant could have been served at any time through substituted service upon the secretary of state. Tarter v. Insco, 550 P.2d 905,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1976).

Statute of limitations not tolled. —

Defendant's absence from state did not serve to toll statute of limitations, because substituted service of process could have been made upon defendant within state in accordance with § 1-6-301(a). Ryel v. Anderies, 4 P.3d 193,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2000).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to defendant emergency room (ER) doctor based on the two-year statute of limitations for medical malpractice actions. The fact that defendant was out of state was not enough to toll the statute of limitations, given the fact that plaintiff had no intention of bringing legal action against the ER doctor within the limitation period.
Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

Tolling provision not rescinded by long-arm statute. —

After the cause of action for medical malpractice accrued, the
defendant departed from the state of Wyoming, and then, as this section
plainly states, during his absence, the statute of limitations was
tolled. The policy behind the tolling provision in the statute of
limitations was not rescinded by the existence of the long-arm statute
(§

5-1-107

), since only if the plaintiff had known where to find
the defendant, which she did not, would the long-arm statute have
operated to permit effective service.
Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

Section does not require plaintiff use diligence in determining out-of-state whereabouts of defendant

to be served. Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

Burden of proof. —

Where a petition on a note and to foreclose a mortgage alleged, and the answer denied, that after the execution of the note defendants departed and remained absent from the state and the note as set out in petition showed on its face that it had matured more than the statutory period prior to the commencement of the action, the burden of proving the absence of defendant from the state was on the plaintiff. Ingersoll v. Davis, 14 Wyo. 120, 82 P. 867,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1905).

Burden is on plaintiff

to prove absence of defendant or to prove that he had absconded in order to conceal himself. Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 821, 104 S. Ct. 85, 78 L. Ed. 2d 94, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1117 (U.S. 1983).

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Testimony that defendants, who were husband and wife, left their home in the state and witness subsequently saw them at the “Denver Tramway Company,” where the husband was working, and that they were living there, “a block away from South Broadway,” without further testimony as to the town, city, county or state in which the places mentioned were situated was insufficient to show defendants' absence from the state, within the meaning of this section. Ingersoll v. Davis, 14 Wyo. 120, 82 P. 867,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1905).

Lack of manufacturer identification on defective product. —

The mere fact that the product causing plaintiffs' injury had no mark identifying the manufacturer did not justify tolling the limitations period for plaintiffs' cause of action against the manufacturer under a theory of “concealment,” given that alternative methods of service were available. Nowotny v. L & B Contract Indus., 933 P.2d 452,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1997).

Effect of former adjudication. —

Where petition on cause of action appearing on its face to be barred by limitations is demurred to (now moved against) for that reason and demurrer (now motion) sustained and another suit is thereafter brought on same facts with petition alleging facts showing statute has not run, latter suit cannot be maintained, as judgment upon demurrer (now motion) in first suit, though error, was a former adjudication barring any other suit. Price v. Bonnifield, 2 Wyo. 80,

1879 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1879). See Rule 7, W.R.C.P.

Subsequent disability. —

When statute once begins to run, it is not arrested by any subsequent disability; and that rule was held to apply to the disability of coverture. Bliler v. Boswell, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1900).

Ten-year statute of limitations was not tolled in action on promissory note,

where the lender knew the borrower's location in California, visited the borrower in California, knew the location of the borrower's residence, knew the borrower's mailing address and knew that the borrower was not avoiding service during this period. Stanbury v. Larsen, 803 P.2d 349,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1990).

Applied

in

Bon v. Lemp, 444 P.2d 333,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

Kuhn v. McKay, 7 Wyo. 42, 49 P. 473,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1897);
Hammons v. International Playtex, Inc., 676 F. Supp. 1114, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 261 (D. Wyo. 1988);
Habermehl v. Potter, 153 F.3d 1137,

1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 20746

(10th Cir. 1998); Hoke v. Motel
6 Jackson & Accor N. Am., Inc., 2006 WY 38, 131 P.3d 369,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes concealment which will prevent running of statute of limitations, 1 ALR2d 630.

Provision of statute of limitations excluding period of defendant's absence from the state as applicable to a local cause of action against individual who was a nonresident when the same arose, 17 ALR2d 502.

Tolling of statute of limitations where process is not served before expiration of limitation period as affected by statutes defining commencement of an action or expressly relating to interruption of running of limitations, 27 ALR2d 236.

Absence of judgment debtor from state as suspending or tolling running of period of limitations as to judgment, 27 ALR2d 839.

Tolling of statute of limitations during absence from state as affected by fact that party claiming benefit of limitations remained subject to service during absence or nonresidence, 55 ALR3d 1158.

Posttraumatic syndrome as tolling running of statute of limitations, 12 ALR5th 546.

§ 1-3-117.
Effect of foreign law.

If by the laws of the
state or country where the cause of action arose the action is barred,
it is also barred in this state.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 43; R.S. 1887, § 2379; R.S. 1899, § 3464; C.S. 1910, § 4308; C.S. 1920, § 5577; R.S. 1931, § 89-419; C.S. 1945, § 3-520; W.S. 1957, § 1-25; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Limitations law of jurisdiction in which cause of action arises is law of this state,

even though a defendant is properly before a Wyoming court, the place where he may be personally served with process and a remedy found. Duke v. Housen, 589 P.2d 334,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 590 P.2d 1340,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 863, 100 S. Ct. 132, 62 L. Ed. 2d 86, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 3006 (U.S. 1979).

Whether characterized as substantive or procedural. —

The limitation of action statute of the foreign jurisdiction in which a cause in question arose is applied by the forum court regardless of whether or not the foreign limitation could be characterized as substantive or procedural: thus, in almost all instances, if a plaintiff's cause of action is time-barred in the jurisdiction in which the cause of action arose, it would be barred by the passage of time in the forum court as well. Duke v. Housen, 589 P.2d 334,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 590 P.2d 1340,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 863, 100 S. Ct. 132, 62 L. Ed. 2d 86, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 3006 (U.S. 1979).

Application of “borrowing” statute. —

In applying a “borrowing” statute, a court must consider not only the borrowed limitation of action statute itself, but also any applicable tolling or other statutes as well as pertinent court cases of that state where the cause of action accrued. Duke v. Housen, 589 P.2d 334,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 590 P.2d 1340,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 863, 100 S. Ct. 132, 62 L. Ed. 2d 86, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 3006 (U.S. 1979).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-117

(2015) did not provide a basis to apply the Shoshone
and Arapahoe Law and Order Code's two-year statute of limitations
to a non-Indian plaintiff's action against two tribal members for
injuries sustained in an accident that occurred on a state highway
within the reservation as the reservation was neither a state nor
a country. C'Hair v. Dist. Court of the Ninth Judicial Dist., 2015 WY 116, 357 P.3d 723,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2015).

Accrual of cause of action on mortgage obligation. —

Where a mortgage contains a promise or obligation to pay the indebtedness, and the indebtedness is to be paid in Colorado at a specified time, but it was not then and there paid, the cause of action accrues at that time and at that place. Baker v. First Nat'l Bank, 603 P.2d 397,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 488

(Wyo. 1979).

Accrual of action involving mineral production. —

Although subject matter of contract was mineral production in Wyoming, cause of action arose in Colorado where contract was made and negotiated in Colorado, documents were delivered there, and alleged breach clearly occurred in Colorado; under this section, applicable statute of limitations was therefore that of Colorado. BHP Petroleum (Ams.), Inc. v. Texaco Exploration & Prod., Inc., 1 P.3d 1253,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2000).

Application of “borrowing” statute. —

When applying
a foreign jurisdiction's statute of limitations pursuant to Wyoming's
borrowing statute, a Wyoming court should not also consider or apply
that foreign jurisdiction's choice of law statutes or case law. Therefore,
in a negligence case arising from a vehicle accident in Montana,
the
Montana three-year statute of limitations applied, but not its
choice
of law principles. Boutelle v. Boutelle, 2014 WY 147, 337 P.3d 1148,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2014).

Quoted

in

Cantonwine v. Fehling, 582 P.2d 592,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1978); Stanbury v. Larsen, 803 P.2d 349,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Kuhn v. McKay, 7 Wyo. 42, 49 P. 473,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1897); Amrein v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 851 P.2d 769,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1993); Hronek v. Saint Joseph's Children's Home, 866 P.2d 1305,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For note, “An Interest Analysis Approach to Wyoming's Borrowing Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 717 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of arbitration provision in contract for purchase or sale of goods, products or services, 95 ALR3d 1145.

Validity and effect of stipulation in contract to effect that it shall be governed by law of particular state which is neither place where contract is made nor place where it is to be performed, 16 ALR4th 967.

Validity, construction and application, in nonstatutory personal injury actions, of state statute providing for borrowing of statute of limitations of another state, 41 ALR4th 1025.